Connecticut, session 2026, HB05552.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Automated license plate reader" means a mobile or fixed
electronic image recording device that is capable, in combination with
computer programs or algorithms, of converting images of license
plates into computer-readable data;
(2) "Automated license plate reader information" means information
that is (A) gathered by an automated license plate reader, or (B) created
through an analysis of the information gathered by an automated
license plate reader;
(3) "Vendor" means a person that (A) owns or operates an automated
license plate reader, or (B) has access to the automated license plate
reader information gathered by the automated license plate reader;
(4) "Contracting public agency" means the public agency that enters
into a contract with a vendor concerning the creation, use or storage of
automated license plate reader information;
LCO 1 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5552
(5) "Person" means an individual, association, corporation, limited
liability company, partnership, trust or other legal entity; and
(6) "Public agency" has the same meaning as provided in section 1-
200 of the general statutes.
(b) On and after October 1, 2026, no public agency shall enter into or
renew any contract with a vendor, unless such contract provides that
the vendor shall not engage in any of the following activities with
respect to any automated license plate reader information gathered in
this state:
(1) Sell such automated license plate reader information;
(2) Share or transfer such automated license plate reader information
to any person or public agency other than the contracting public agency,
without receiving the prior express written authorization of the
contracting public agency for the sharing of such automated license
plate reader information for a specific purpose, and prior notification to
the Governor;
(3) Allow any person other than the contracting public agency to
access such automated license plate reader information, unless the
vendor is required to allow such person to access such automated
license plate reader information pursuant to a signed judicial warrant or
valid court order issued by a court of competent jurisdiction. As used in
this subdivision, "judicial warrant or valid court order" excludes any
subpoena or demand of a grand jury investigation; or
(4) Store or maintain the contracting public agency's automated
license plate reader information (A) with the automated license plate
reader information stored or maintained pursuant to a contract with a
different public agency concerning automated license plate reader
information or any such automated license plate reader information
stored or maintained pursuant to a contract with any other person
concerning such automated license plate reader information, (B) in a
state other than this state, or (C) in a manner that is not in accordance
LCO 2 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5552
with industry-recognized data security practices, including, but not
limited to, using encryption when transmitting or storing such
automated license plate reader information.
(c) Beginning on October 1, 2026, no public agency shall enter into or
renew any contract with a vendor unless such contract (1) provides that
the vendor consents to personal jurisdiction in this state in the event of
any legal proceeding, and (2) contains a choice of law provision that
states that Connecticut state law shall be the controlling law for the
contract.
(d) (1) Automated license plate reader information is confidential and
shall not be deemed a public record for the purposes of the Freedom of
Information Act, as defined in section 1-200 of the general statutes, and
shall not be disclosed, except as provided in subdivision (2) of
subsection (b) of this section and subdivision (2) of this subsection. Any
of the following information shall be disclosable pursuant to said act:
(A) Locations of any still or video image recording device used as part
of an automated license plate reader; and
(B) Any data, other than automated license plate reader information,
derived from any audit of an automated license plate reader, usage logs
for such reader and logs detailing access to automated license plate
reader information, provided any such data disclosable under this
subsection has all automated license plate reader information redacted
from otherwise disclosable data.
(2) Any person who seeks to obtain automated license plate reader
information concerning a motor vehicle that was registered in such
person's name at the time of the creation of such information may obtain
such information from the contracting public agency, provided if such
motor vehicle is also registered in another person's name, such person
also consents to such disclosure.
(e) The Attorney General may institute proceedings to enforce the
provisions of subsections (b) and (c) of this section. In any proceedings
LCO 3 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5552
instituted under this subsection, the court may grant appropriate relief,
including, but not limited to, preliminary, temporary or permanent
injunctive relief.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Subsec. (a)(6), the definition of "personal identifying information"
was deleted as unnecessary, in Subsec. (c), Subdiv. designators were
added for clarity, in Subsecs. (d)(1)(A) and (B), "system" was deleted for
consistency, and throughout the bill, references to "data" and "such
information" were changed to "automated license plate reader
information", for consistency.
GAE Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 4 of 4